apertium-chv.chv.lexc
LEXICON NP-ANT-M-EY-RUS

                                                               NP-ANT-M ;
:%{ъ%}                                                         NP-ANT-M "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F-LN

                                                               NP-ANT-F ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<loc%>:%>р%{A%}                             K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<abl%>:%>р%{A%}н                            K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                    K "weight: 1.0" ; 

!LEXICON NP-ANT-F-RUS

!:%{ъ%}                                                        NP-ANT-F ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F-U

:%{в%}                                                         NP-ANT-F ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M-IJ

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%{й%}                                       NOMINAL ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<nom%>:й                                    K "weight: -1.0" ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:                                           NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF-RUS 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%{ъ%}                                      NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OV
! Russian family names not ending in -н (or -л) with feminine form +а

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{ъ%}                                       NOMINAL ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:%{а%}                                       NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-COG-IN
! Russian family names ending in -н (or -л) with feminine form +а

                                                               NP-COG-OV ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<loc%>:%{ъ%}%>р%{A%}                        K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<abl%>:%{ъ%}%>р%{A%}н                       K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<px2sg%>%{ъ%}%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}               K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<loc%>:%{а%}%>р%{A%}                        K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<abl%>:%{а%}%>р%{A%}н                       K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<px2sg%>%{а%}%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}               K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-IJ

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:и%{й%}                                      NOMINAL ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<nom%>:ий                                   K "weight: -1.0" ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а%{й%}я                                     NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-COG-ENKO

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:{о%}                                       NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH
! For patronyms ending with -вич, напр. "Иванович"
! Their feminine equivalents end with -вна, напр. "Иванова"

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич%{ъ%}                                    NOMINAL ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вн%{а%}                                     NOMINAL ;

LEXICON NP-PAT-ILICH 

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:ч%{ъ%}                                      NOMINAL ;
%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:ничн%{а%}                                   NOMINAL ;


LEXICON N
! Standard noun lexicon

%<n%>:                                                         NOMINAL ;
%<n%>%<attr%>:                                                 #;

LEXICON N-PL
! Noun in plural form in lexicon

%<n%>%<pl%>:                                                   CASE ;

LEXICON N-ONLY-POSS
! Noun that do not have forms without possessive

%<n%>:                                                         POSS-PX ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX
! Lexicon for compound words with izafet (px3sp) that are introduced
! in the lexicon, e.g. "ача пахчи".

%<n%>:                                                         PLURAL ;
!%<n%>%<pl%>:%>се%{м%}                                         POSS ;
%<n%>%<attr%>:%>%{и%}%{н%}                                     # ;    ! Dir/RL

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-PL
! Lexicon for compound words with izafet (px3sp) and plural

%<n%>%<pl%>:                                                   CASE ;

LEXICON N-ĔŞ 
! "Chuvash" words ending in consonant (except -н, -л)

                                                               N ;
%<n%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                                 K "weight: 1.0" ;
!%<n%>%<px3sp%>%<dat%>:%{ă%}%>н%{A%}                            K "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON N-IZM
! Lexicon for words Russian words ending in consonant (except н or л),
! especially for those whose last vowel is front

:%{ъ%}                                                         N-ĔŞ ;

LEXICON N-VLAÇ
! Lexicon for words ending in -сть from Russian, in Chuvash all
! non-nominative forms are based on the stem -ҫ, but the lemma
! remains -сть, e.g. должность--дожноҫра

%<n%>:ҫ                                                        NOMINAL ;
%<n%>:ҫ%{ь%}                                                   NOMINAL ;         ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<attr%>:ҫ                                                # ;
%<n%>%<nom%>:сть                                               # "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<n%>%<attr%>:сть                                              # "weight: 1.0" ;
%<n%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:ҫ%>н%{A%}                                K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON N-SUPĂN
! Lexicon for words with alternative locative in -рA (in addition to -TA).
! These are words ending in н or нь, and often also the ones ending in л or ль.

%<n%>:                                                         NOMINAL ;
%<n%>%<attr%>:                                                 # ;
%<n%>%<loc%>:%>р%{A%}                                          K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<n%>%<abl%>:%>р%{A%}н                                         K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<n%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                                 K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON N-BENZIN
! Lexicon for words Russian words ending in л or н, especially for those
! whose last vowel is front

:%{ъ%}                                                         N-SUPĂN ;

LEXICON N-RADIO

%<n%>:%{в%}%{☭%}                                               NOMINAL ;
%<n%>%<attr%>:                                                 # ;

LEXICON N-TU
! Lexicon for words like "ту" which have an epenthetic -в- and stem vowel
! reduction.

%<n%>:%{в%}                                                    NOMINAL ;
%<n%>%<attr%>:                                                 # ;
%<n%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%{в%}%>н%{A%}                            K "weight: 1.0" ; 
%<n%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%{в%}%>н%{A%}                            K "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON N-YEN
! This is for nouns with bare locative/ablative in -че/-чен 
! напр. ен - енче/енчен

                                                               N ;
! The regular forms are optional.
%<n%>%<loc%>:ре                                                K "weight: 1.0" ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<abl%>:рен                                               K "weight: 1.0" ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:ри                                        # "weight: 1.0" ; ! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<loc%>:ри                                                SUBST "weight: 1.0" ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N-MUZEY
! This is for Russian nouns ending in -ey (they accept suffixes with front and back vowels )
! ("Chuvash" words ending in -ey are N-ĔŞ)

                                                               N ;
:%{ъ%}                                                         N "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON N-INFORMACI
! This is for nouns ending in и

:%{й%}                                                         N ;
! These are optional spoken/informal forms.
%<n%>%<px2sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}                                 K "weight: 1.0" ;	! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<px3sp%>%<dat%>:%{ă%}%>н%{A%}                            K "weight: 1.0" ;	! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>:%>нче                                    K "weight: 1.0" ;           ! территоринче	! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>:%>нчен                                   K "weight: 1.0" ;           ! территоринчен	! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:%>нчи                            K "weight: 1.0" ;           ! территоринчи	! Dir/LR
%<n%>%<px3sp%>%<loc%>%<subst%>:%>нчи                           NOMINAL "weight: 1.0" ;     ! территоринчи	! Dir/LR

LEXICON Nouns 
шӑллӑм:шӑл%{ː%}                      N-ONLY-POSS; ! "младший брат"
ен:ен            N-YEN ;!""
йывӑҫ% вулли:йывӑҫ% вулли  N-COMPOUND-PX ;!""ствол дерева
куҫ% харши:куҫ% харши            N-COMPOUND-PX ;!""
пил% йышшисем:пил% йышшисем            N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ;!""
пуплев% пайӗсем:пуплев% пайӗсем            N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ;!""
ҫанталӑк% тапхӑрӗсем:ҫанталӑк% тапхӑрӗсем            N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ;!""
сӗтпе% ӳсекенсем:сӗтпе% ӳсекенсем            N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ;!""
ҫурла% уйӑхӗ:ҫурла% уйӑхӗ            N-COMPOUND-PX ;!""
хӗҫпӑшаллӑ% вӑйсем:хӗҫпӑшаллӑ% вӑйсем            N-PL ;!""
чикӗ% хуралҫи:чикӗ% хуралҫи  N-COMPOUND-PX ;!""
эрешмен:эрешмен N-SUPĂN;!""
карт:карт N-ĔŞ ; ! ""
крепость:крепо N-VLAÇ; ! ""
шаланкӑ:шаланкӑ N; ! "сарыч, канюк; коршун; сова; иволга; "
сурпан:сурпан N-SUPĂN; ! "головной убор замужней женщины;  отвал плуга"
саппас:саппас N-ĔŞ; ! "запас"
венерологи:венерологи N-INFORMACI; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
аллотропи:аллотропи N-INFORMACI ; ! ""
протоиерей:протоиерей N-MUZEY ; ! ""
эндокринологи:эндокринологи N-INFORMACI ; ! ""
латин:латин N-BENZIN ; ! ""
агропромышленность:агропромышленно N-VLAÇ; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
национальность:национально N-VLAÇ; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
ди-джей:ди-джей N-MUZEY; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
авиачасть:авиача N-VLAÇ; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
велосипедист:велосипедист N-IZM; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
бинт:бинт N-IZM; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
электрометр:электрометр N-IZM; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
дисциплинӑлӑх:дисциплинӑлӑх N-ĔŞ; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
ҫурхат:ҫурхат N-ĔŞ; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
вӗҫкӗн:вӗҫкӗн N-SUPĂN ; ! ""
LEXICON Proper 
Алексей:Алексей                      NP-ANT-M-EY-RUS ; ! ""
Андрей:Андрей                        NP-ANT-M-EY-RUS ; ! ""
Валерий:Валери NP-ANT-M-IJ; ! ""
Рембрандт:Рембрандт NP-COG-MF-RUS ; ! ""
Маркс:Маркс                  NP-COG-MF-RUS; !""
Поликарпович:Поликарпович NP-COG-MF;
Байгилдин:Байгилдин     NP-COG-IN;!""
Гаделшин:Гаделшин     NP-COG-IN;!""
Гимаев:Гимаев     NP-COG-OV;!""
Ивановский:Ивановск    NP-COG-IJ;!""
Котлыгилдин:Котлыгилдин     NP-COG-IN;!""
Кочетков:Кочетков     NP-COG-OV;!""
Пятков:Пятков     NP-COG-OV;!""
Сафиуллин:Сафиуллин     NP-COG-IN;!""
Чесноков:Чесноков     NP-COG-OV;!""
Хузангай:Хузангай     NP-COG-MF;!""
Айхи:Айхи     NP-COG-MF;!""
Алос-и-Фонт:Алос-и-Фонт     NP-COG-MF-RUS;!""
Каппелер:Каппелер     NP-COG-MF-RUS;!""
Сент-Экзюпери:Сент-Экзюпери     NP-COG-MF;!""
Московский:Московск  NP-COG-IJ ; ! ""
Вишневский:Вишневск  NP-COG-IJ ; ! ""
Тимошенко:Тимошенк  NP-COG-ENKO ; ! ""
Предаченко:Предаченк  NP-COG-ENKO ; ! ""
Тихоненко:Тихоненк  NP-COG-ENKO ; ! ""
Черненко:Черненк  NP-COG-ENKO ; ! ""
Заволжский:Заволжск NP-COG-IJ;!""
Сергей:Сергей NP-ANT-M-EY-RUS ; 
Кугей:Кугей     NP-ANT-M-EY-RUS;!""
Радий:Ради     NP-ANT-M-IJ;!""
Алсу:Алсу     NP-ANT-F-U;!""
Вагдагуль:Вагдагуль     NP-ANT-F-LN;!""
Зухрагуль:Зухрагуль     NP-ANT-F-LN;!""
Наргуль:Наргуль     NP-ANT-F-LN;!""
Сафагуль:Сафагуль     NP-ANT-F-LN;!""
Пинеслу:Пинеслу     NP-ANT-F-U;!""
Тинеслу:Тинеслу     NP-ANT-F-U;!""
Ильич:Ильи NP-PAT-ILICH ; ! ""
Георгиевич:Георгие NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Климович:Климо NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Рафикович:Рафико NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Елисеевич:Елисее NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Георгий:Георги NP-ANT-M-IJ; ! ""
Конфуций:Конфуци NP-ANT-M-IJ; ! ""
 LEXICON Abbreviations
волокно:волокно                N-RADIO ; ! ""Q_CHECK
ранчо:ранчо                N-RADIO ; ! ""
терраса:террас%{а%}                N ; ! ""
трико:трико                N-RADIO ; ! ""
трофей:трофей                N-MUZEY ; ! ""
ӑнлану:ӑнлану N-TU; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
макӑрашу:макӑрашу N-TU; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
ҫилленӳ:ҫилленӳ N-TU; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
хирӗҫтӑру:хирӗҫтӑру N-TU; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
ӳпре-пӑван:ӳпре-пӑван N-SUPĂN; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
бубен:бубен N-BENZIN; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
креол:креол N-BENZIN; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
розмарин:розмарин N-BENZIN; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
наварх:наварх N-IZM; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
замша:замш%{а%} N; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
каратэ-до:каратэ-до N-RADIO; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
верфь:верфь N; ! src: Chuvash wordlist ""
